Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 2 State Highway System

32-4-20.
Composition of state highway system.

The state highway system shall consist of an integrated network of arterials and of other public roads or bypasses serving as the major collectors therefor. No public road shall be designated as a part of the state highway system unless it meets at least one of the following requirements:

Serves trips of substantial length and duration indicative of regional, state-wide, or interstate importance;

Connects adjoining county seats;

Connects urban or regional areas with outlying areas, both intrastate and interstate; or

Serves as part of the principal collector network for the state-wide and interstate arterial public road system.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-202, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1343, § 5/HB 817; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1072, § 1/SB 169.

Cross references.

Giving of notice of intention to condemn road constituting part of state highway system for purpose of constructing electric power plant, §

22-3-42

.

32-4-21.
Designation of roads as part of state highway system.

Whenever the board, or the commissioner when the board is not in session, deems it necessary and in the public interest to have a new or existing public road designated as part of the state highway system, whether as additional mileage or as part of a substitution or relocation, the board, by resolution, or the commissioner, by written notice to the board, may designate such road to be a part of the state highway system. If the road proposed to be designated is a part of either a county road system or a municipal street system, the department shall give written notice to the county or municipality of the effective date that such road shall become part of the state highway system. Any change on the state highway system by designation shall be recorded on the official map and in the written records of the state highway system, as provided for in subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 32-4-2.

History.

Laws 1818, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 947; Code 1863, §§ 579, 580; Code 1868, §§ 643, 644; Code 1873, §§ 604, 605; Code 1882, §§ 604, 605; Civil Code 1895, §§ 520, 521; Civil Code 1910, §§ 640, 641; Code 1933, §§ 95-201, 95-202; Code 1933, § 95A-202, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-22.
Creation of Developmental Highway System.

There is created as a part of the state highway system a system of public roads to be known as the Developmental Highway System which shall consist of the following road corridors (not in order of priority):

Appalachian;

The South Georgia Parkway;

U.S. 27;

U.S. 82;

Golden Isles;

Savannah River;

U.S. 441;

Fall Line;

U.S. 319;

U.S. 19;

U.S. 84;

U.S. 1/SR 17;

SR 72;

Northern Arc further identified as the North Georgia Connector between the U.S. Highway 411 and U.S. Highway 41 interchange in Bartow County to State Highway 316 in Gwinnett County;

East-west Highway from I-59 North to I-85 North;

Truck access routes, including without limitation:

SR 133 from Albany to Valdosta;

SR 40 from Folkston to St. Marys; and

SR 125 from Fitzgerald to I-75;

SR 32;

Power Alley, U.S. 280 from Columbus to Savannah;

SR 125 from its intersection with SR 107 in Ben Hill County (Fitzgerald Bypass) to its intersection with SR 32 in Irwin County; and

SR 15 from its intersection with US 441/SR 24 at Watkinsville to its intersection with US 1 in Toombs County.

Without limiting the foregoing, said system is further identified as including those roads and corridors referred to as “the Governor’s Road Improvement Program” in that resolution adopted by the State Transportation Board dated November 17, 1988.

The location and mileage of the Developmental Highway System shall be as generally described in subsection (a) of this Code section, with the power of the State Transportation Board to make such variances therein as shall be dictated by sound engineering and construction practices.

The Developmental Highway System shall be under the control and supervision of the board, subject to the provisions of this Code section or any other Act of the General Assembly; provided, however, that the State Road and Tollway Authority is authorized to construct all or any part of such system and to enter into agreements with the department, pursuant to Code Section 32-2-61, for such purpose. Any project the cost of which is paid from the proceeds of garvee bonds as defined in Code Section 32-10-90.1 shall be, pursuant to a contract or agreement between the authority and the department, planned, designed, and constructed by the Department of Transportation or a contractor contracting with the Department of Transportation.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-4-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 221, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 701, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1215, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 320, § 1/SB 107.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, a punctuation change was made at the beginning of paragraph (a)(2).

Law reviews.

For note on 1989 enactment of this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 257 (1989).

32-4-23.
[Reserved] Council on Rural Transportation and Economic Development; creation and membership; powers, duties, and authority; funding; expense allowances; repeal.

History.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 1512, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 976, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 1997, p. 976, § 1, effective March 31, 2000.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2007, this Code section number was designated as reserved.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 976, § 1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective March 31, 2000.

32-4-24.
Alternative tourism routes; welcome centers authorized.

The board shall designate as alternative tourism routes roads that are a part of the state highway system that traverse the state and pass through or in close proximity to historic sites or tourist attractions in the state. Interstate highways that traverse the state shall not be eligible for designation as an alternative tourism route. The initial alternative tourism routes shall be U.S. Highway 27 and U.S. Highway 441.

The board shall consult with the Department of Economic Development, county governing authorities, and historical sites and tourist attractions located in this state in the selection of additional alternative tourism routes. The Department of Economic Development shall promote such routes and sites and attractions along such routes to the motoring public.

Subject to the appropriation process, the department may within five years of the designation of an alternative tourism route construct within 20 miles of the state line on each end of such route a welcome center. Subject to the appropriation process, if the department decides to construct such a center, it shall negotiate and contract with the local governing authorities where the welcome center is located for the maintenance and operation of such center.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-4-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 291, § 1/SB 282.